South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 7, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-7-95.  (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when the Attorney General brings or defends an action in the name of the State of South Carolina pursuant to any power granted by common law, the Constitution of this State, or any provision of law, the Attorney General acts in the public interest of the State of South Carolina and not as the legal representative or attorney of any department or agency of State government, including the executive, legislative, and judicial branches or any of the boards connected therewith. Such departments, agencies, or boards are not parties to these actions, and the documents or electronically stored information of such departments, agencies, or boards are not in the possession, custody, or control of the Attorney General. (B) This section does not affect the ability of the Attorney General to bring or defend an action in a proprietary capacity on behalf of and representing any such department, agency or board. SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 5, Title 39 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 39-5-55. The Attorney General may, in an action brought under this article, obtain the remedy of disgorgement. SECTION 3.  Article 1, Chapter 5, Title 39 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 39-5-85. Materials prepared or drafted by the Attorney General or his staff or shared with the Attorney General or his staff for law enforcement purposes in the public interest while the Attorney General or his staff are investigating potential violations of this article shall be considered privileged. This privilege survives the end of the investigation whether by litigation, settlement, or otherwise. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----